test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ketted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below) There are still problems
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ǩeʹtted: # Verb 'to cook' - full paradigm
     ǩeʹtted+V+Inf: ǩeʹtted
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ǩeâttam
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ǩeâttak
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩeâtt
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ǩeʹttep
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ǩeʹttveʹted
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩeʹtte
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: ǩiiʹttet
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ǩiiʹtt
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ǩiʹttem
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ǩiʹttiǩ
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ǩiiʹtti
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ǩiiʹttim, ǩiiʹttin]
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ǩiiʹttid
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ǩiʹtte
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: ǩiʹtteš
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ǩeâttam
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Sg1: ǩiiʹttžem
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Sg2: ǩiiʹttžiǩ
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Sg3: ǩiiʹttež
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Pl1: [ǩiiʹttžep, ǩiiʹttžim, ǩiiʹttžin]
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Pl2: ǩiiʹttžid 
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Pl3: ǩiiʹttže
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+Sg4: ǩiiʹttžet
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pot+ConNeg: ǩiiʹttže
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Sg1: ǩeâttčem
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Sg2: ǩeâttčiǩ
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Sg3: ǩeâttči
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Pl1: [ǩeâttčim, ǩeâttčin, ǩeâttčep]
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Pl2: ǩeâttčid
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Pl3: ǩeâttče
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+Sg4: ǩeâttčeš
     ǩeʹtted+V+Cond+ConNeg: ǩeâttče
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg2: ǩiiʹtt
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg3: ǩeâttas
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl1: ǩeʹttep
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl2: ǩeʹtted
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl3: ǩeâttaz       # ǩeâtˈtaz
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: ǩiiʹtt
     ǩeʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: ǩittu      # ǩitˈtu
     ǩeʹtted+V+Actio+Ess: ǩeʹttmen
     ǩeʹtted+V+Actio: ǩeʹttem
     ǩeʹtted+V+Act+PrsPrc: ǩiʹtti
     ǩeʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: ǩeâttam
     ǩeʹtted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: ǩittum         # ǩitˈtum
     ǩeʹtted+V+VAbess: [ǩiiʹttkani, ǩiiʹttǩeännai]
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ger+Ess: ǩiiʹtteen
     ǩeʹtted+V+Ger+Instr: ǩiiʹtteeʹl
     ǩeʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: ǩeâttam
